Hawaii statutes.
[§201N-3] General duties of the
coordinator. The coordinator shall:

(1) Consult with appropriate state and county
agencies to develop and establish a permit plan application format and
procedure designed to ensure a timely review to obtain required permits and
approvals for renewable energy facilities;

(2) Receive a permit plan application, in a form as
the coordinator shall prescribe, from an applicant for the approval of the
siting, development, construction, and operation of a renewable energy facility,
with an appropriate initial application fee as determined by the coordinator;

(3) Identify all state and county permits necessary
for approval of the renewable energy facility;

(4) Assist in the permit plan application process by
coordinating permitting processes, giving technical assistance, overseeing the
creation of the permit plan, and providing general oversight to facilitate the
timely review and permitting of the siting of a renewable energy facility;

(5) Gather from the applicant any information the
coordinator finds relevant and necessary for the reviewing and processing of a
permit application by the federal, state, and county agencies;

(6) Coordinate public meetings on the island where a
renewable energy facility is proposed to be developed to:

(A) Allow members of the affected communities
to provide input regarding the development of the renewable energy facility;

(B) Promote public awareness of the plan for
the renewable energy facility in the proposed area; and

(C) Allow the coordinator, the applicant, and
any applicable agency to gain public sentiment and input regarding the proposed
development of the renewable energy facility, and incorporate the public
sentiment and input into the planning of the proposed renewable energy facility;
and

(7) Work
with the federal, state, and county agencies and the applicant to determine the
terms and conditions of the permit plan and permits that are necessary to
effectuate this chapter and to protect the public health and safety and promote
the general welfare. [L 2008, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next